src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_LÖRPPÖ
!!  The quantitative gradation of p before ö is in class {{@LEXNAME@}} and
!!  old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 p~0 ö
!!€  lörppö: lörppö+A+Sg+Nom # blabbermouth
!!€  lörpössä: lörppö+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  lörpöistä: lörppö+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  lörppöihin: lörppö+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  lörpömpi: lörppö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  lörpöin: lörppö+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:pö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VELTTO
!!  The quantitative gradation of t before o is in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, 
!!  which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~0 o
!!€  veltto: veltto+A+Sg+Nom # lazy
!!€  veltossa: veltto+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  veltoista: veltto+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  velttoihin: veltto+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  veltompi: veltto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  veltoin: veltto+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_VIMMATTU
!!  The quantitative gradation of t before u is in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, 
!!  which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 
!!  The u stems with quantitative t gradation are commonest with nut participle
!!  passive derivation’s back form (-ttu).
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~0 u
!!€  vimmattu: vimmattu+A+Sg+Nom # wicked
!!€  vimmatussa: vimmattu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  vimmatuista: vimmattu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  vimmattuihin: vimmattu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  vimmatumpi: vimmattu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  vimmatuin: vimmattu+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_YLENNETTY
!!  The quantitative gradation of t before y is in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, 
!!  which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 
!!  The u stems with quantitative t gradation are commonest with nut participle
!!  passive derivation’s front (-tty).
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~0 y
!!€  ylennetty: ylennetty+A+Sg+Nom # promoted
!!€  ylennetyssä: ylennetty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  ylennetyistä: ylennetty+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  ylennettyihin: ylennetty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  ylennetympi: ylennetty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  ylennetyin: ylennetty+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KYYTTÖ
!!  The quantitative gradation of t before y is in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, 
!!  which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~0 ö
!!€  kyyttö: kyyttö+A+Sg+Nom # ?????
!!€  kyytössä: kyyttö+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kyytöistä: kyyttö+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  kyyttöihin: kyyttö+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  kyytömpi: kyyttö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  kyytöin: kyyttö+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  The quantitave k gradation has a variant that allows use of apostrophe
!!  instead of nothing in the weak grade.

LEXICON ADJ_LAKO
!!  The class for o final bisyllabic stems with optional ’ is {{@LEXNAME@}},
!!  this is a subset of dictionary class ¹⁻D. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~’~0 o
!!€  lako: lako+A+Sg+Nom
!!€  laossa: lako+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  la’ossa: lako+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  laompi: lako+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  laoin: lako+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:’o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:’o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  There's no k to optional apostrophe with u.
!!  nor with y and k:
!!  nor ö with k:
!!  There's none with k gradating to always apostrophe either.
!!  For examples of these, see noun classes


LEXICON ADJ_KELPO
!!  The qualitative gradation of p between vowels in o stems goes to v,
!!  the class for this is {{@LEXNAME@}}, the dictionary class for this is
!!  ¹⁻E.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 p~v o
!!€  kelpo: kelpo+A+Sg+Nom # proper
!!€  kelvossa: kelpo+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kelpoina: kelpo+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  kelvoista: kelpo+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  kelvompi: kelpo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  kelvoin: kelpo+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:po  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:vo  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:vo  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:vo  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:vo  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  There are none ending in vowel + pu
!!  nor with y and p
!!  nor ö with p.

LEXICON ADJ_MIETO
!!  The gradation of t ~ d after o is in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, the
!!  dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~d o
!!€  mieto: mieto+A+Sg+Nom # mild
!!€  miedossa: mieto+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mietoihin: mieto+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  miedoista: mieto+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  miedompi: mieto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  miedoin: mieto+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:do  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:do  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:do  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:do  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_VIIPALOITU
!!  The gradation of t ~ d after u is in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, the
!!  dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.
!!  The commonest t ~ d variation in u stems comes from nut participle’s
!!  passive’s back form (-tu).
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~d u
!!€  viipaloitu: viipaloitu+A+Sg+Nom # sliced
!!€  viipaloidussa: viipaloitu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  viipaloituihin: viipaloitu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  viipaloiduista: viipaloitu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  viipaloidumpi: viipaloitu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  viipaloiduin: viipaloitu+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:du  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:du  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:du  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:du  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aito+A:ai  ADJ_MIETO  ;
aktivoitu+A:aktivoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
alipestattu+A:ali#pestat  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
ansaittu+A:ansait  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
apinoitu+A:apinoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
demytologisoitu+A:demytologisoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
dimeroitu+A:dimeroi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
edellä% esitetty+A:edellä% esitet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
edellä% mainittu+A:edellä% mainit  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
edeltäpäätetty+A:edeltäpäätet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
ennaltaäänitetty+A:ennaltaäänitet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
epäaito+A:epäai  ADJ_MIETO  ;
epäaito+A:epä#ai  ADJ_MIETO  ;
epäaito+A:epäai  ADJ_MIETO  ;
epäkelpo+A:epäkel  ADJ_KELPO  ;
epäkelpo+A:epä#kel  ADJ_KELPO  ;
erioikeutettu+A:eri#oikeutet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
esitäytetty+A:esi#täytet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
etsitty+A:etsit  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
etuoikeutettu+A:etuoikeutet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
fermentoitu+A:fermentoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
halogenoitu+A:halogenoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
halveksittu+A:halveksit  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
hienonnettu+A:hienonnet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
hillitty+A:hillit  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
hutiloitu+A:hutiloi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
hyvinvarustettu+A:hyvin#varustet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
hyväksikäytetty+A:hyväksikäytet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
hävitetty+A:hävitet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
identifioitu+A:identifioi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
immunosuppressoitu+A:immunosuppressoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
joditettu+A:joditet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
jumaloitu+A:jumaloi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
järjestetty+A:järjestet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
kahlittu+A:kahlit  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
kalibroitu+A:kalibroi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
kaltto+A:kalt  ADJ_VELTTO  ;
katenoitu+A:katenoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
kavallettu+A:kavallet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
kelpo+A:kel  ADJ_KELPO  ;
kengitetty+A:kengitet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
kierteitetty+A:kierteitet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
kolhittu+A:kolhit  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
konfiguroitu+A:konfiguroi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
koteloitu+A:koteloi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
koulutettu+A:koulutet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
kristitty+A:kristit  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
kuorrutettu+A:kuorrutet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
kyyttö+A:kyyt  ADJ_KYYTTÖ  ;
käsinkehrätty+A:käsinkehrät  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
käyttöönotettu+A:käyttöönotet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
lako+A:la  ADJ_LAKO  ;
lantto+A:lant  ADJ_VELTTO  ;
laskelmoitu+A:laskelmoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
letto+A:let  ADJ_VELTTO  ;
leuto+A:leu  ADJ_MIETO  ;
lievennetty+A:lievennet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
liimattu+A:liimat  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
lämmitetty+A:lämmitet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
lämpökrakattu+A:lämpökrakat  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
lörppö+A:lörp  ADJ_LÖRPPÖ  ;
magnetisoitu+A:magnetisoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
marmorikuvioitu+A:marmori#kuvioi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
mietitty+A:mietit  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
mieto+A:mie  ADJ_MIETO  ;
mikrosoitu+A:mikrosoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
moottoroitu+A:moottoroi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
mukautettu+A:mukautet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
neutralisoitu+A:neutralisoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
niin% kutsuttu+A:niin% #kutsut ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
nypitty+A:nypit  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
oletettu+A:oletet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
ontto+A:ont  ADJ_VELTTO  ;
orkestroitu+A:orkestroi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
orpo+A:or  ADJ_KELPO  ;
outo+A:ou  ADJ_MIETO  ;
parfymoitu+A:parfymoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
pelastettu+A:pelastet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
pelko+A:pel  ADJ_LAKO  ;
pelko+A:pel  ADJ_LAKO  ;
personoitu+A:personoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
pidätetty+A:pidätet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
purkitettu+A:purkitet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
pyntätty+A:pyntät  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
rasioitu+A:rasioi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
ratto+A:rat  ADJ_VELTTO  ;
revitty+A:revit  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
rintaruokittu+A:rinta#ruokit  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
rutto+A:rut  ADJ_VELTTO  ;
saippuoitu+A:saippuoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
selvitetty+A:selvitet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
siunattu+A:siunat  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
sofistikoitu+A:sofistikoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
sublimoitu+A:sublimoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
sytytetty+A:sytytet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
taitettu+A:taitet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
tasopolarisoitu+A:tasopolarisoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
tietty+A:tiet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
tulitettu+A:tulitet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
täydennetty+A:täydennet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
vaihdettu+A:vaihdet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
veistetty+A:veistet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
veltto+A:velt  ADJ_VELTTO  ;
vieroitettu+A:vieroitet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
vietto+A:viet  ADJ_VELTTO  ;
vulkanoitu+A:vulkanoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
vähennetty+A:vähennet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
yhdennetty+A:yhdennet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
ylikyllästetty+A:ylikyllästet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
ylimainostettu+A:yli#mainostet  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
äänieristetty+A:äänieristet  ADJ_YLENNETTY  ;
